New Jersey, session 221, A2744.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  No later than six months after the effective date of this act, the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services shall submit a report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), outlining the impacts, to date, of expanding NJ FamilyCare eligibility, pursuant to the federal Affordable Care Act, on access to health benefits coverage and services for the States veterans and their families.  The report shall include any recommendations for improvement to enrollment outreach, as well services provided, to veterans and their families eligible for NJ Family Care under the Affordable Care Act expansion group.  The division shall notify the public when the report has been finalized, which notification shall include a link to the report on divisions website. b.    As used in the section: Affordable Care Act means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act Pub.L.111-148, as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, Pub.L.111-152, and any federal rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. NJ FamilyCare means the program established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.). Veteran means any resident of the State who has been discharged honorably or under general honorable conditions in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or a Reserve component thereof, or the National Guard of this State or another state. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire after the submission of the report, pursuant to section 1 of this act.